Illinois, session 104th, SB1946.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 5changing Section 50 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 128/50)7    Sec. 50. Crisis response mapping data grants.8    (a) Subject to appropriations made for the purposes of 9this Section, the State Board or its designee shall make 10crisis response mapping data available to any appropriation, a 11public school district, a charter school, a special education 12cooperative or district, an education for employment system, a 13State-approved area career center, a public university 14laboratory school, regional office of education or 15intermediate service center, early childhood or preschool 16program supported by the Early Childhood Block Grant, the 17Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy, the Department of 18Juvenile Justice School District, a regional office of 19education, the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois 20School for the Visually Impaired, the Philip J. Rock Center 21and School, an early childhood or preschool program supported 22by the Early Childhood Block Grant, or any other public school 23entity designated by the State Board of Education by rule. Any   SB1946- 2 -LRB104 10964 LNS 21046 b1entity that receives crisis response mapping data pursuant to 2this subsection shall , may apply to the State Board of 3Education or the State Board's designee for a grant to obtain 4crisis response mapping data and to provide copies of the 5crisis response mapping data to appropriate local, county, 6State, and federal first responders for use in response to 7emergencies. The crisis response mapping data shall be stored 8and provided in an electronic or digital format to assist 9first responders in responding to emergencies at the school.10    (b) Subject to appropriation, including funding for any 11administrative costs reasonably incurred, by the State Board 12of Education or the State Board's designee shall provide 13crisis response mapping data to eligible entities named in 14subsection (a) in the order in which such entities apply for it 15and until any appropriations made for the purposes of this 16Section are exhausted. in the administration of the grant 17program described by this Section, the State Board shall 18provide grants to any entity in subsection (a) upon approval 19of an application submitted by the entity to cover the costs 20incurred in obtaining crisis response mapping data under this 21Section. The grant Any application for crisis response mapping 22data must include crisis response mapping data for all schools 23under the jurisdiction of the entity submitting the 24application, including, in the case of a public school 25district, any charter schools authorized by the school board 26for the school district.  SB1946- 3 -LRB104 10964 LNS 21046 b1    (c) The To be eligible for a grant under this Section, the 2crisis response mapping data provided by the State Board or 3the State Board's designee must include, at a minimum:4        (1) be compatible and integrate into security software 5    platforms in use by the specific school for which the data 6    is provided without requiring local law enforcement 7    agencies or the school district to purchase additional 8    software or requiring the integration of third-party 9    software to view the data; 10        (2) be compatible with security software platforms in 11    use by the specific school for which the data is provided 12    without requiring local public safety agencies or the 13    school district to purchase additional software or 14    requiring the integration of third-party software to view 15    the data; 16        (3) be capable of being provided in a printable 17    format; 18        (4) be verified for accuracy by an on-site 19    walk-through of the school building and grounds; 20        (5) be oriented to true north; 21        (6) be overlaid on current aerial imagery or plans of 22    the school building; 23        (7) contain site-specific labeling that matches the 24    structure of the school building, including room labels, 25    hallway names, and external door or stairwell numbers and 26    the location of hazards, critical utilities, key boxes,   SB1946- 4 -LRB104 10964 LNS 21046 b1    automated external defibrillators, and trauma kits, and 2    that matches the school grounds, including parking areas, 3    athletic fields, surrounding roads, and neighboring 4    properties; and 5        (8) be overlaid with gridded x/y coordinates. 6    (d) Subject to appropriation, the crisis response mapping 7data may be reviewed annually to update the data as necessary.8    (e) Crisis response mapping data obtained pursuant to this 9Section are confidential and exempt from disclosure under the 10Freedom of Information Act.11    (f) The State Board may adopt rules to implement the 12provisions of this Section. 13(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 14103-780, eff. 8-2-24.)